examples/data/hyph-nl-sample.tex
% hyph-nl-sample.tex — minimal Dutch hyphenation pattern sample
%
% This is a REDUCED excerpt of the standard Dutch TeX hyphenation patterns
% (hyph-nl.tex, originally by Piet Tutelaers, public domain).
% It is provided as an example data file for tc-lib-pdf/E064.
%
% Full patterns are available from:
%   https://www.ctan.org/tex-archive/language/hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex
%
% Format: \patterns{ <pattern> ... }
% Each pattern is a string of letters optionally interleaved with digits.
% A digit k at position i means: if the subword matches, priority k applies
% at that break point.  Odd priorities allow hyphenation; even priorities prevent it.
% The pattern without digits is the lookup key.
%
\patterns{
.on5
.ver5
aa2
2aa
ab5
2b1r
be5
co2
2co
d1w
e2l
en5
2en
er5
ge5
1ge
2h1
i2n
in5
2in
1ka
2k1l
k5le
2k1n
k2o
k5om
2k1r
1la
l1a
2l1b
1le
2l1c
l2e
l2i
l2o
l2u
l2y
ma5
2m1b
2m1m
2m1p
n2a
na5
2n1b
ne5
2n1f
n2i
ni5
2n1k
2n1l
2n1m
2n1n
n2o
no5
2n1p
n2u
nu5
2n1v
o2n
on5
2on
oo2
2oo
or5
2or
ou5
2ou
p2a
pa5
p2e
pe5
p2i
pi5
p2o
po5
2p1r
p2u
pu5
r2a
ra5
2r1b
re5
r2i
ri5
2r1k
r2o
ro5
r2u
ru5
s2a
sa5
2s1b
se5
2s1k
s2i
si5
s2o
so5
2s1p
s2t
st5
2s1t
s2u
su5
t2a
ta5
t2e
te5
t2i
ti5
t2o
to5
t2r
tr5
t2u
tu5
u2it
uit5
u2i
ui5
v2a
va5
ve5
v2e
v2i
vi5
v2o
vo5
v2r
vr5
v2u
vu5
wa5
2w1b
we5
wi5
wo5
woordvoer5
y2
z2a
za5
ze5
zi5
zo5
zu5
.oor5
.uit5
.ver5
.be5
.ge5
.on5
1baar
1heid
1lijk
1loos
5heid.
5baar.
5lijk.
5loos.
}
